Hawaii statutes.
§171-34 Planning; intensive agricultural
and pasture uses. In addition to the requirements set forth in section
171-33, if the intended disposition is for intensive agricultural or pasture
uses, the board of land and natural resources shall:

(1) Make or cause to be made an on-the-ground
inspection of the land;

(2) Secure data or information from the land study
bureau relating to such parcel;

(3) Review any other pertinent information with
respect to the land and the surrounding area; and

(4) Based upon information obtained, prepare a
written report on the land, which report shall include the following:

(A) The class of the land within the specific
use for which disposition is intended;

(B) The condition of the land with respect to
its state of development;

(C) Existing improvements, if any;

(D) Extent of uncontrolled erosion if any;

(E) Nature of forage; and

(F) Extent of infestation with noxious weeds.
[L 1962, c 32, pt of §2; Supp, §103A-34; HRS §171-34]

Case Notes

Absent showing that
lot sizes were unrelated to intended use and insufficient for economic
operation, court held board did not abuse discretion in setting lot size. 60
H. 228, 588 P.2d 430.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next